lexc/misc/enhuadv1.lexc
!!!enhuadv1.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +Adv +Pref+ +Relative
      
LEXICON Root
Adv;
Prefleg;
Prefnum;
Prefik;

LEXICON Prefleg
+Pref+:leg       Adv1 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:legesleg       Adv1 ; ! optional article prefix
                        Adv1 ; ! empty string entry
LEXICON Prefnum
+Pref+:sok       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:több       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:fél       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harmad       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyed       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötöd       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatod       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:heted       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcad       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenced       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tized       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:huszad       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:század       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezred       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:egy       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:két       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:három       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:négy       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:öt       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hat       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hét       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolc       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilenc       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:tíz       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:húsz       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:harminc       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:negyven       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ötven       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hatvan       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:hetven       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:nyolcvan       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:kilencven       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:száz       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ezer       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:millió       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:milliárd       Adv2 ; ! optional article prefix
                        Adv2 ; ! empty string entry
LEXICON Prefik
+Pref+:el       Adv3 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:le       Adv3 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:fel       Adv3 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:föl       Adv3 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ide       Adv3 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:oda       Adv3 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:át       Adv3 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:ki       Adv3 ; ! optional article prefix
+Pref+:meg       Adv3 ; ! optional article prefix
                 Adv3; 

LEXICON Adv3
adózatlanul AddAdv;
azonosultan AddAdv;
gyógyulatlanul AddAdv;
hurcolódva AddAdv;
kérdőn AddAdv;
kérdőre AddAdv;
siratatlanul AddAdv;
szerkesztetlenül AddAdv;
szolgálatlanul AddAdv;
sértődötten AddAdv;
veszíthetetlenül AddAdv;
áradtan AddAdv;
árultan AddAdv;

LEXICON Adv2
esztendőnként AddAdv;
felé AddAdv;
felől AddAdv;
féleképp AddAdv;
féleképpen AddAdv;
hangúan AddAdv;
havonként AddAdv;
havonta AddAdv;
hetenként AddAdv;
hetente AddAdv;
naponként AddAdv;
naponta AddAdv;
oldalúan AddAdv;
percenként AddAdv;
rét AddAdv;
százaléknyi AddAdv;
százaléknyira AddAdv;
évenként AddAdv;
évente AddAdv;
ízben AddAdv;
óránként AddAdv;

LEXICON AddAdv
[stem]+Adv:0     #;

LEXICON Adv1
elsőként AddAdv;
fentebb AddAdv;
hamarabbiak AddAdv;
kivált AddAdv;
lejjebb AddAdv;
többedmagatokkal AddAdv;
vége AddAdv;
LEXICON Adv
ATM AddAdv;
Barbarossa AddAdv;
Camus AddAdv;
DNy AddAdv;
FBI AddAdv;
GIMP AddAdv;
Hermite AddAdv;
Informálisan AddAdv;
Kung AddAdv;
Los AddAdv;
MSZMP AddAdv;
Montaigne AddAdv;
OEM AddAdv;
Pa AddAdv;
Richelieu AddAdv;
Seychelle AddAdv;
Toulouse AddAdv;
Verlaine AddAdv;
XSLT AddAdv;
abszolutisztikusan AddAdv;
adatszerűen AddAdv;
adóilag AddAdv;
aggasztóan AddAdv;
agyagosan AddAdv;
ahonnét AddAdv;
ajtószerűen AddAdv;
akciószerűen AddAdv;
akképp AddAdv;
akutan AddAdv;
akárhányszor AddAdv;
akármikorról AddAdv;
alakoskodóan AddAdv;
alapnyomtatóként AddAdv;
alapúan AddAdv;
alkalmian AddAdv;
alkotóan AddAdv;
alulra AddAdv;
alávalóan AddAdv;
amarébb AddAdv;
amerikaiasan AddAdv;
amnéziásan AddAdv;
amúgysem AddAdv;
angolszerűen AddAdv;
antiszociálisan AddAdv;
anyanyelvileg AddAdv;
apologetikusan AddAdv;
aranyozottan AddAdv;
arculatilag AddAdv;
artisztikusan AddAdv;
aszeptikusan AddAdv;
atlétásan AddAdv;
autokratikusan AddAdv;
axiómaszerűen AddAdv;
azonnal AddAdv;
bajnokilag AddAdv;
balettszerűen AddAdv;
baloldalt AddAdv;
barátkozásilag AddAdv;
becsülettudóan AddAdv;
belgyógyászatilag AddAdv;
bensően AddAdv;
beszélgetően AddAdv;
bibliásan AddAdv;
billióévenként AddAdv;
biszexuálisan AddAdv;
bizonyságtételszerűen AddAdv;
biztosításilag AddAdv;
bodrosan AddAdv;
bokrosan AddAdv;
boltívszerűen AddAdv;
bordázottan AddAdv;
borzalmasan AddAdv;
botlábúan AddAdv;
buborékosan AddAdv;
bumfordian AddAdv;
buzgóan AddAdv;
bámészkodóan AddAdv;
bárhányan AddAdv;
bármi AddAdv;
bázisosan AddAdv;
bérmentve AddAdv;
bömbölően AddAdv;
búvópatakszerűen AddAdv;
bőrszíjszerűen AddAdv;
bűnügyileg AddAdv;
centrálisan AddAdv;
cigányútra AddAdv;
cirádásan AddAdv;
csakis AddAdv;
csalárdan AddAdv;
csapásszerűen AddAdv;
csekkfüzetszerűen AddAdv;
csicsásan AddAdv;
csillagszórószerűen AddAdv;
csipásan AddAdv;
csomósan AddAdv;
csuklyaszerűen AddAdv;
csúfan AddAdv;
céltudatosan AddAdv;
dalszerűen AddAdv;
dekoratívan AddAdv;
derűsen AddAdv;
dicséretreméltóan AddAdv;
direkte AddAdv;
dobozoltan AddAdv;
dossziészerűen AddAdv;
dátumilag AddAdv;
döntően AddAdv;
egyben AddAdv;
egyetemleg AddAdv;
egymásután AddAdv;
egyvalami AddAdv;
ehetően AddAdv;
elegendően AddAdv;
elfelé AddAdv;
elméletien AddAdv;
előbbről AddAdv;
emblémaszerűen AddAdv;
emitt AddAdv;
epigrammatikusan AddAdv;
erotikusan AddAdv;
esetleg AddAdv;
etológiailag AddAdv;
ezerszerte AddAdv;
fakultan AddAdv;
farmakológiailag AddAdv;
fejezhetően AddAdv;
felettébb AddAdv;
felügyeletileg AddAdv;
festőileg AddAdv;
filmvászonszerűen AddAdv;
flegmatikusan AddAdv;
fogyaszthatóan AddAdv;
folyondárosan AddAdv;
fonásszerűen AddAdv;
forradalmilag AddAdv;
frissibe AddAdv;
furtonfurt AddAdv;
fázisosan AddAdv;
félreértelmezhetően AddAdv;
férhetően AddAdv;
följebbről AddAdv;
fülkeszerűen AddAdv;
főződően AddAdv;
gazdaságosan AddAdv;
gigabyte AddAdv;
gondosan AddAdv;
gumírozottan AddAdv;
gyanúsan AddAdv;
gyárszerűen AddAdv;
gyötrően AddAdv;
göcsörtösen AddAdv;
hadműveletileg AddAdv;
hajlósan AddAdv;
halilag AddAdv;
halálfélelemszerűen AddAdv;
hangsúlyosan AddAdv;
harcászatilag AddAdv;
harsonásan AddAdv;
hatnaposan AddAdv;
hatásilag AddAdv;
helybenhagyóan AddAdv;
hercegien AddAdv;
hevederszerűen AddAdv;
hipnotizálóan AddAdv;
hivalkodóan AddAdv;
hollandosan AddAdv;
horkanásszerűen AddAdv;
hugyosan AddAdv;
huszonháromfelé AddAdv;
hányfelé AddAdv;
hátulra AddAdv;
hídszerűen AddAdv;
hüvelyileg AddAdv;
idegborzolóan AddAdv;
idáig AddAdv;
igazmondóan AddAdv;
ikonográfiailag AddAdv;
ilyesvalahol AddAdv;
immár AddAdv;
indulatilag AddAdv;
ingerszerűen AddAdv;
interpellációszerűen AddAdv;
irodalmilag AddAdv;
iskolaügyileg AddAdv;
italilag AddAdv;
javallottan AddAdv;
jellemezhetően AddAdv;
jogkörileg AddAdv;
járulékosan AddAdv;
jórészben AddAdv;
kW AddAdv;
kalodaszerűen AddAdv;
kapcsolatilag AddAdv;
karmailag AddAdv;
katartikusan AddAdv;
kedvűen AddAdv;
keresetileg AddAdv;
kesztyűszerűen AddAdv;
kiejtésileg AddAdv;
kilencvennégyfelé AddAdv;
kiskedden AddAdv;
kizárólag AddAdv;
kocsonyásan AddAdv;
kommentárszerűen AddAdv;
konfekcionáltan AddAdv;
kontyoltan AddAdv;
korallszerűen AddAdv;
korrigálandóan AddAdv;
kottaszerűen AddAdv;
krémszerűen AddAdv;
kumuláltan AddAdv;
kábítószerileg AddAdv;
kárörvendően AddAdv;
képzavarilag AddAdv;
kétkedően AddAdv;
kísérletileg AddAdv;
költségileg AddAdv;
körbeforgóan AddAdv;
körötte AddAdv;
követelhetően AddAdv;
közelebb AddAdv;
közlekedésügyileg AddAdv;
középmagasan AddAdv;
külsőleg AddAdv;
lakatosian AddAdv;
lapszámozottan AddAdv;
legbalrább AddAdv;
lejtően AddAdv;
lentről AddAdv;
libásan AddAdv;
lokomotívszerűen AddAdv;
láncszemszerűen AddAdv;
lázadásszerűen AddAdv;
lényegszerűen AddAdv;
m AddAdv;
magnószerűen AddAdv;
majdhogy AddAdv;
marionettszerűen AddAdv;
medenceszerűen AddAdv;
megtérülésileg AddAdv;
mennydörgésszerűen AddAdv;
mesterfokúan AddAdv;
mihamarabbiak AddAdv;
millióhavonta AddAdv;
mindemellett AddAdv;
mindenütt AddAdv;
mintaszerűen AddAdv;
mocskosan AddAdv;
monopolizáltan AddAdv;
mostanára AddAdv;
mulatságosan AddAdv;
muzeálisan AddAdv;
máshonnét AddAdv;
másvalahányadszor AddAdv;
méltatlankodóan AddAdv;
mértékűen AddAdv;
műalkotásszerűen AddAdv;
nagybecsűen AddAdv;
nagystílűen AddAdv;
naposan AddAdv;
neheztelően AddAdv;
nemzetközien AddAdv;
normatívan AddAdv;
nyelvjárásilag AddAdv;
nyolcvanhetente AddAdv;
nyomvonalszerűen AddAdv;
nyírtan AddAdv;
néhányan AddAdv;
népszokásszerűen AddAdv;
odabentre AddAdv;
off-line AddAdv;
oldalra AddAdv;
olyasvalahányan AddAdv;
operásan AddAdv;
országszerte AddAdv;
osztályúan AddAdv;
pallérozottan AddAdv;
papírvékonyan AddAdv;
parlamentszerűen AddAdv;
patriarchálisan AddAdv;
periferiálisan AddAdv;
pikánsan AddAdv;
plasztikailag AddAdv;
polgárjogilag AddAdv;
porosan AddAdv;
primadonnásan AddAdv;
prológusszerűen AddAdv;
publikusan AddAdv;
páncélszerűen AddAdv;
párttörténetileg AddAdv;
pólusszerűen AddAdv;
radírszerűen AddAdv;
rangúan AddAdv;
regulárisan AddAdv;
rendeltetésszerűen AddAdv;
reprezentáltan AddAdv;
riadalmasan AddAdv;
robinsonosan AddAdv;
rongyoltan AddAdv;
rugalmasan AddAdv;
rákvörösen AddAdv;
régimódian AddAdv;
rítusszerűen AddAdv;
sablonszerűen AddAdv;
savanyúan AddAdv;
sejttanilag AddAdv;
serkentőleg AddAdv;
siváran AddAdv;
sokszorosan AddAdv;
sorvasztóan AddAdv;
stabilan AddAdv;
stílszerűen AddAdv;
suttyomban AddAdv;
szabásilag AddAdv;
szakosodottan AddAdv;
szappanosan AddAdv;
szektorálisan AddAdv;
szemkápráztatóan AddAdv;
szentenciaszerűen AddAdv;
szertartásosan AddAdv;
szikkadtan AddAdv;
szintén AddAdv;
szobrászian AddAdv;
szolidaritásilag AddAdv;
sztereoszkóposan AddAdv;
számbelileg AddAdv;
szándékosan AddAdv;
százszázalékosan AddAdv;
színházilag AddAdv;
szívrepesve AddAdv;
szórványszerűen AddAdv;
szülőileg AddAdv;
sátortetőszerűen AddAdv;
súlyarányosan AddAdv;
tajtékzóan AddAdv;
tanteremszerűen AddAdv;
taposóaknaszerűen AddAdv;
tavaszosan AddAdv;
telefonilag AddAdv;
telíthetően AddAdv;
terjedhetően AddAdv;
tervrajzszerűen AddAdv;
tilosan AddAdv;
tituláltan AddAdv;
tombolóan AddAdv;
totyakosan AddAdv;
trilliószám AddAdv;
tudtul AddAdv;
tágasan AddAdv;
táplálkozásilag AddAdv;
tárvanyitva AddAdv;
térképileg AddAdv;
többedmagukkal AddAdv;
tömören AddAdv;
törődően AddAdv;
tüneményszerűen AddAdv;
ugrásszerűen AddAdv;
ujjasan AddAdv;
urnásan AddAdv;
utópisztikusan AddAdv;
valahányadszor AddAdv;
valóan AddAdv;
vastagítottan AddAdv;
vertikálisan AddAdv;
vidáman AddAdv;
világan AddAdv;
világítóan AddAdv;
viszonylag AddAdv;
vonalkásan AddAdv;
választékosan AddAdv;
várandósan AddAdv;
végleg AddAdv;
véresszájúan AddAdv;
vízjogilag AddAdv;
zeneileg AddAdv;
zsebkésszerűen AddAdv;
zsírosan AddAdv;
ÁNTSZ AddAdv;
álarcosan AddAdv;
állhatatosan AddAdv;
álruhásan AddAdv;
árnyalatnyian AddAdv;
ébren AddAdv;
életképszerűen AddAdv;
éppígy AddAdv;
értelmileg AddAdv;
érően AddAdv;
írandóan AddAdv;
ólomszínűen AddAdv;
öltözködésileg AddAdv;
önműködően AddAdv;
örvösen AddAdv;
összhatásilag AddAdv;
ötvenötfelé AddAdv;
újságírósan AddAdv;
ültéből AddAdv;
üzemtervileg AddAdv;
